Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-928
Political subdivision; state highway
use for special event; applicability of act.

The Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act shall apply to
any claim arising during the time specified in a notice provided by a political
subdivision pursuant to subsection (3) of section 39-1359.

Laws 2011, LB589, § 3.